Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB1902.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 2710 heading, (a) and (c) of Title 18 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes, amended by the act of December 3, 2002 (P.L.1176, No.143), declared unconstitutional, 936 A.2d 188 (Pa. Commonwealth 2007), affirmed, 951 A.2d 345 (2008), are amended and the section is amended by adding a subsection to read:§ 2710. [Ethnic] Hate-based intimidation.(a) Offense defined.--A person commits the offense of [ethnic] hate-based intimidation if, with malicious intention 12345678910111213141516171819 toward the race, color, religion [or], national origin, ethnicity, ancestry, sex, gender, gender identity, gender expression, sexual orientation or disability of another individual [or], group of individuals[, he commits an offense under any other provision of this article or] or a person with whom the individual or group is associated, the person commits a personal injury crime as defined in section 103 of the act of November 24, 1998 (P.L.882, No.111), known as the Crime Victims Act, which results in bodily injury, an offense under Chapter 33 (relating to arson, criminal mischief and other property destruction) [exclusive of section 3307 (relating to institutional vandalism)] or an offense under section 3503 (relating to criminal trespass) with respect to such individual or his or her property or with respect to one or more members of such group or to their property.* * *(b.1) Construction.--Nothing in this section may be construed to prohibit, limit or punish religiously motivated speech or conduct that is otherwise protected by the Constitution of the United States, the Constitution of Pennsylvania or the act of December 9, 2002 (P.L.1701, No.214), known as the Religious Freedom Protection Act. SHALL BE CONSTRUED TO PROHIBIT, LIMIT OR OTHERWISE PUNISH A PERSON IN THE FREE EXERCISE OR ENJOYMENT OF A RIGHT OR PRIVILEGE SECURED TO THE PERSON BY THE CONSTITUTION OR LAWS OF THE UNITED STATES OR THE CONSTITUTION OF PENNSYLVANIA OR LAWS OF THIS COMMONWEALTH.(c) Definition.--As used in this section "malicious intention" means the intention to commit any act, the commission of which is a necessary element of any offense referred to in subsection (a) motivated by hatred toward the race, color, 20250HB1902PN3032 - 2 - <--<--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 religion [or], national origin, ethnicity, ancestry, sex, gender, gender identity, gender expression, sexual orientation or disability of another individual or group of individuals.Section 2. Section 8309(a) of Title 42 is amended and the section is amended by adding a subsection to read:§ 8309. Civil rights violations.(a) Redress for personal injury.--[A person] An individual who incurs injury to his or her person or damage or loss to his or her property as a result of conduct described in 18 Pa.C.S. § 2710 (relating to [ethnic] hate-based intimidation) or 3307 (relating to institutional vandalism) shall have a right of action [against the actor for] in a court of common pleas for a preliminary or permanent injunction, damages or other appropriate civil or equitable relief[.] against the actor, a person who has solicited the actor to engage in the conduct and a person who has knowingly attempted to provide or provided aid to the actor with the intent that the actor engage in the conduct. In the action, the issue of whether the defendant engaged in the conduct alleged shall be determined according to the burden of proof used in other civil actions for similar relief. The plaintiff may seek recovery for any of the following:(1) General and special damages, including damages for emotional distress. Damages under this paragraph shall be actual damages or $500, whichever is greater.(2) Punitive damages.(3) Reasonable attorney fees and costs.(4) Injunctive and other equitable relief.(5) Such other relief which the court deems necessary and proper.20250HB1902PN3032 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 * * *(g) Construction.--Nothing in this section may be construed to prohibit, limit or punish religiously motivated speech or conduct that is otherwise protected by the Constitution of the United States, the Constitution of Pennsylvania or the act of December 9, 2002 (P.L.1701, No.214), known as the Religious Freedom Protection Act. SHALL BE CONSTRUED TO PROHIBIT, LIMIT OR OTHERWISE PUNISH A PERSON IN THE FREE EXERCISE OR ENJOYMENT OF A RIGHT OR PRIVILEGE SECURED TO THE PERSON BY THE CONSTITUTION OR LAWS OF THE UNITED STATES OR THE CONSTITUTION OF PENNSYLVANIA OR LAWS OF THIS COMMONWEALTH.Section 3. Section 2162 of Title 53 is amended by adding a definition to read:§ 2162. Definitions.The following words and phrases when used in this subchapter shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:* * *"Hate-based intimidation." An offense specified under 18 Pa.C.S. § 2710 (relating to hate-based intimidation).* * *Section 4. Title 53 is amended by adding a section to read:§ 2173. Annual officer training on hate-based intimidation. (a) Training.--The commission and the Pennsylvania State Police shall consult with and incorporate feedback from relevant community-based and faith-based stakeholders and groups, as well as racial justice and legal stakeholders and groups, to develop training under this section. After the consultation, the commission and the Pennsylvania State Police shall, in consultation with the Pennsylvania Human Relations Commission 20250HB1902PN3032 - 4 - <--<--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 and the Attorney General, develop, implement and provide annual training on hate-based intimidation to officers. The training shall include, but not be limited to:(1) Identification of hate-based intimidation.(2) Methods to address hate-based intimidation.(3) Reporting of hate-based intimidation.(4) Hate-based intimidation recordkeeping.(5) Any instruction deemed necessary in recognizing enforcement-related bias.(b) Definitions.--As used in this section, the following words and phrases shall have the meanings given to them in this subsection unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Officer." Any of the following:(1) A full-time or part-time employee assigned to criminal or traffic law enforcement duties of any of the following:(i) A police department of a county, city, borough, town or township.(ii) Any railroad or street railway police.(iii) Any campus or university police department, including the State System of Higher Education and its member institutions.(iv) The Capitol Police.(v) The Harrisburg International Airport Police.(vi) An airport authority police department.(2) A deputy sheriff of a county of the second class.(3) A security officer of a first class city housing authority or a police officer of a second class city housing authority.(4) A county park police officer.20250HB1902PN3032 - 5 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (5) Probation and parole officers.The term excludes a person employed to check parking meters or to perform only administrative duties and auxiliary and fire police.Section 5. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB1902PN3032 - 6 - 12345